Hawaii statutes.
[§461J-10.13] Authorized providers of
continuing competence units. Continuing competence units shall be obtained
from a provider or agency approved by the board, including but not limited to:

(1) Continuing education courses, including home- and
self-study courses, obtained from an agency recognized by the board;

(2) College coursework from an educational
institution accredited by the United States Department of Education or other
agency recognized by the board; and

(3) Other competence related activities approved by
the board or an agency recognized by the board. [L 2013, c 35, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next